Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB314.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Customer" includes a prospective customer;
(b) "Discriminate in the provision of financial services":
1. Means utilizing a social credit score to, directly or indirectly, decline to
provide full and equal enjoyment in the provision of financial
services; and
2. Includes refusing to provide, terminating, or restricting financial
services;
(c) "Financial institution" means:
1. A bank that has total assets over one hundred billion dollars
($100,000,000,000);
2. A payment processor, credit card company, payment service provider,
or payment gateway that has processed more than one hundred billion
dollars ($100,000,000,000) in transactions within the last calendar
year; or
3. Any affiliate or subsidiary of a financial institution referred to in
subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph;
(d) "Financial service" or "service" means any financial product or service
offered by a financial institution;
(e) "Person" has the same meaning as in KRS 367.110;
(f) "Protected from government interference":
1. Means any speech, religious exercise, association, expression, or
conduct that is protected under the First Amendment to the
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/17/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 371
Constitution of the United States, Section 5 or 8 of the Constitution of
Kentucky, or any other federal or state law, including:
a. All aspects of religious observance and practice and belief and
affiliation;
b. The person's opinions, speech, or other expressive activities; and
c. The lawful preservation of privacy regarding activities referred
to in this subparagraph, including the refusal to disclose
lobbying, political activity, or contributions beyond what is
required by federal or state law; and
2. Does not include any activity that the Supreme Court of the United
States has expressly held is unprotected on or before the effective date
of this Act, including:
a. Obscenity;
b. Fraud;
c. Incitement;
d. True threats;
e. Fighting words; and
f. Defamation; and
(g) "Social credit score":
1. Means any analysis, rating, scoring, list, or tabulation that evaluates
any of the following:
a. Any person's exercise of religion or speech that is protected from
government interference;
b. Failure or refusal to:
i. Adopt any targets or disclosures related to greenhouse gas
emissions beyond what is required by federal or state law;
ii. Conduct any type of racial, diversity, or gender audit or
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/17/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 371
disclosure;
iii. Provide any form of quota, preference, or benefit based, in
whole or part, on race, diversity, or gender; or
iv. Facilitate or assist employees in obtaining abortions or
gender reassignment services; or
c. Participation in any lawful business associations or business
activities, including business activities with an entity that
engages in:
i. The exploration, production, utilization, transportation,
sale, or manufacturing of fossil fuel sources or fossil fuel-
based energy; or
ii. Manufacturing, distribution, wholesale, supply, or retail of
firearms, firearms accessories, or ammunition; and
2. For purposes of subparagraph 1.c. of this paragraph, does not include
the evaluation of quantifiable financial risks of a person based on
impartial, financial-risk based standards that include activities
described in subparagraph 1.c. of this paragraph if the standards are:
a. Established in advance; and
b. Publicly disclosed to customers.
(2) A financial institution shall not:
(a) Discriminate in the provision of financial services to a person; or
(b) Agree, conspire, or coordinate, directly or indirectly, including through any
intermediary or third party, with another person or group of persons, to
engage in any activity prohibited by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) (a) If a financial institution refuses to provide, restricts, or terminates service to
a customer, the customer may, within ninety (90) days of receipt of notice,
request a statement of the specific reasons for the refusal, restriction, or
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/17/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 371
termination.
(b) A request under paragraph (a) of this subsection may be made to a
customer service representative or designated account representative of the
financial institution by phone, mail, or email.
(c) A financial institution shall, within fourteen (14) days of receiving a request
under paragraph (a) of this subsection, provide a statement, by mail and
email, of the specific reasons for the refusal, restriction, or termination that
includes:
1. A detailed explanation of the basis for the refusal, restriction, or
termination of service, including a description of any of the customer's
speech, religious exercise, business association or activity, or other
conduct that was, in whole or in part, the basis of the refusal,
restriction, or termination of service, if applicable;
2. A copy of the terms of service agreed to by the customer and financial
institution, if applicable; and
3. A citation to the specific provisions of the terms of service upon which
the financial institution relied in refusing to provide, restricting, or
terminating the service.
(4) (a) A violation of this section shall be deemed to be an unfair, false, misleading,
or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation
of KRS 367.170.
(b) All of the remedies, powers, and duties, provided to the Attorney General or
any other person under KRS 367.110 to 367.300, and the penalties provided
in KRS 367.990, pertaining to acts and practices declared unlawful by KRS
367.170, shall apply with equal force and effect to a violation of this section.
(5) This section shall be construed in favor of the broad protection of the conduct,
opinions, and beliefs protected by:
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/17/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 371
(a) The First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States;
(b) The Constitution of Kentucky; and
(c) Any other state or federal law.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/17/2025 2:46 PM Jacketed